cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX A 0 рӑн/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӗн/RT [^аӑут]
SFX A т чӗн/RT т
SFX A а ин/RT а
SFX A у ӑвӗн/RT у
SFX A ӑ вин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ син/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ ин/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӑма/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмӑра/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ма/RS а
SFX A 0 мӑра/RS а
SFX A у ӑвӑма/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑра/RS у
SFX A ӑ вӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑма/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A 0 ма/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мӑра/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 уна/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑра/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A а уна/RS а
SFX A а ӑра/RS а
SFX A у ӑвуна/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑра/RS у
SFX A ӑ вуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ куна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ луна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ муна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ руна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ суна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ туна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шуна/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ уна/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ра/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 не/RT [^аӑу]
SFX A а ине/RT а
SFX A у ӑвне/RT у
SFX A ӑ вине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ ине/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӑмра/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмӑрта/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 мра/RS а
SFX A 0 мӑрта/RS а
SFX A у ӑвӑмра/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑрта/RS у
SFX A ӑ вӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмра/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A 0 мра/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мӑрта/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 унта/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑрта/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A а унта/RS а
SFX A а ӑрта/RS а
SFX A у ӑвунта/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑрта/RS у
SFX A ӑ вунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шунта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑрта/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ унта/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 рта/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӗнче/RT [^аӑу]
SFX A а инче/RT а
SFX A у ӑвӗнче/RT у
SFX A ӑ винче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ линче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ минче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ ринче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ синче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ инче/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӗнчи/RT [^аӑу]
SFX A а инчи/RT а
SFX A у ӑвӗнчи/RT у
SFX A ӑ винчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ линчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ минчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ ринчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ синчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ инчи/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӑмран/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑмӑртан/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 мран/RS а
SFX A 0 мӑртан/RS а
SFX A у ӑвӑмран/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑмӑртан/RS у
SFX A ӑ вӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмран/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑмӑртан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A 0 мран/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 мӑртан/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 унтан/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A 0 ӑртан/RS [^аӑу]
SFX A а унтан/RS а
SFX A а ӑртан/RS а
SFX A у ӑвунтан/RS у
SFX A у ӑвӑртан/RS у
SFX A ӑ вунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сунтан/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
