cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӑнӑх/A
ҫарма/A
ҫупкӑм/A
ҫырма/A
ӑмӑрт/AH
ӑнӑҫусӑр/A
ӑрӑм/A
ӑрых/A
ӑссӑр/AE
ӑшаланчӑк/A
Авиньон/A
Айпӑлат/A
Акрам/A
Алентюк/A
Альфред/A
Анисимович/A
Аполлонович/A
Арккуҫ/A
Архимед/A
Ахванюк/A
Байкальск/A
Белгород/A
Бийск/A
Борисоглебск/A
Бургос/A
Валерьевич/A
Вашингтон/A
Весулла/A
Витальевич/A
Волккӑм/A
Габон/A
Гелиос/A
Гибралтар/A
Грин/A
Давидович/A
Денвер/A
Димитровград/A
Дублин/A
Екатеринбург/A
Ернеслу/A
Желтухин/A
Зееман/A
Игорь/A
Илларион/A
Ильмурса/A
Иоганн/A
Иртул/A
Итапай/A
Кӑрнуй/A
Кӗреҫтук/A
Каменногорск/A
Карлович/A
Кача/A
Кировоград/A
Комсомольск/A
Краков/A
Кузнецк/A
Кыштым/A
Лениногорск/A
Лиска/A
Люксембург/A
Маҫут/A
Макарович/A
Маркуҫ/A
Махмуть/A
Микка/A
Минск/A
Минюхха/A
Михатюк/A
Моршанск/A
Мутюҫ/A
Нант/A
Нетюсь/A
Новгород/A
Ньюпорт/A
Оксфорд/A
Оскол/A
Павлович/A
Пайраш/A
Пантелеймонович/A
Пегас/A
Петруҫ/A
Пикрав/A
Питер/A
Питукан/A
Портсмут/A
Пусан/A
Ржев/A
Рсанюк/A
Саҫтул/A
Сайра/A
Самуил/A
Сархан/A
Саяногорск/A
Селигер/A
Серж/A
Сетруна/A
Сильмук/A
Синярка/A
Совккай/A
Стас/A
Суринам/A
Тайрук/A
Тевеслу/A
Тимӗрплат/A
Тобольск/A
Туй/A
Тукташ/A
Тюмакка/A
Укаслу/A
Унеслу/A
Усман/A
Ухтийар/A
Филарет/A
Хӗреҫка/A
Харон/A
Хун/A
Чӑмай/A
Шӑмакка/A
Шерихва/A
Шуркка/A
Элихван/A
Энтюк/A
Эртюхха/A
Якав/A
Яман/A
Ярмушка/A
Яштӑвар/A
аборт/A
авангард/A
авиакомпас/A
авмак/A
автозавод/A
автомотошкул/A
автотараса/A
агитпункт/A
адресант/A
айӑплав/A
айсӑр/A
аквалангист/A
аксельбант/A
алӑк/A
алкоголик/A
алфавит/A
альт/A
американец/A
анӑс/A
анахронизм/A
анонимщик/A
антиколониализм/A
антракт/A
апатлӑх/A
аппаратчик/A
арӑслан/A
аристократ/A
арматурщик/A
артиллерист/A
аршӑ/A
асам/A
аскӑнлӑх/A
астару/A
атаман/A
атрибут/A
африкантроп/A
ачамӑшкӑ/A
аэроклуб/A
бай/A
балласт/A
бантик/A
бас/A
бегемот/A
бенуар/A
бизнесмен/A
бицепс/A
болельщик/A
бот/A
браунинг/A
броня/A
булочник/A
бурт/A
вӑйҫах/A
вӑрӑ/A
вӑрнар/A
вайсӑрлӑх/A
вальцовщик/A
варкаш/HAE
вахмистр/A
венгр/A
ветеран/A
видеоматериал/A
витерӳ/A
вокалист/A
вулӑ/A
вупкӑн/A
вырӑс/A
газопровод/A
гарнир/A
гейзер/A
генштаб/A
геройлӑх/A
гитлеровец/A
гопак/A
гравировщик/A
грузчик/A
дебит/A
депо/A
диаметр/A
дирхем/A
доктринер/A
дубликат/A
жокей/A
заложник/A
зефир/A
изафет/A
импортёр/A
инструктаж/A
ислам/A
йӑлтӑрав/A
йӑс/A
йыхравҫӑ/A
кӑлат/A
кӑпӑл/A
кӑтрашка/A
кабинет/A
кайӑк/A
калмӑк/A
канӑҫсӑрлӑх/A
капӑрлӑх/A
каптаж/A
карбонит/A
картер/A
каскаланчӑк/A
католик/A
каюра/A
кизил/A
киносценарист/A
климат/A
коллектив/A
комендор/A
комсомолец/A
контакт/A
копиист/A
космополит/A
кратер/A
круп/A
куккук/A
кумкӑч/A
курӑк/A
куршанак/A
кювет/A
лавсан/A
ланч/A
ласт/A
лейкоцит/A
лилипут/A
литфонд/A
лунит/A
мӑйпӑран/A
мӑриккан/A
магнетизм/A
макарин/A
мандарин/A
мародёр/A
материк/A
медосмотр/A
метаморфоз/A
микрорайон/A
мистик/A
монотип/A
мужик/A
мускус/A
наҫилкка/A
нарком/A
небоскреб/A
новаторлӑх/A
обоз/A
омар/A
оргкомитет/A
отстойник/A
пӑрҫа/A
пӑскӑнчӑк/A
пӑянам/A
пакрас/A
памфлетист/A
парӑм/A
парлак/A
пасарлӑх/A
патшалӑх/A
пеленг/A
печатник/A
пистон/A
плащ/A
подписчик/A
политинформатор/A
портрет/A
практикум/A
приказ/A
провинциал/A
пропашник/A
проходной/A
пукрав/A
пульт/A
пуса/A
пухча/A
рабкор/A
радиохум/A
рант/A
реалист/A
реестр/A
релятивизм/A
реформист/A
ротор/A
сӑлӑп/A
сӑпатлану/A
саботаж/A
сакӑлтак/A
самодержец/A
сапаланчӑк/A
сарма/A
сверловщик/A
селектор/A
сеяльщик/A
системӑсӑрлӑх/A
скутер/A
собор/A
социалист/A
спринтер/A
створ/A
стратостат/A
суд/A
сульфамид/A
сурханах/A
сыв/A
сыхланулӑх/A
тӑкӑслӑх/A
тӑнӑҫлӑх/A
тӑратма/A
тӑхра/A
таврам/A
талак/A
танкодром/A
тарай/A
таянчӑк/A
тепловоз/A
тираж/A
торс/A
траур/A
трубопровод/A
тулли/A
тупӑшакан/A
турашӑл/A
тутӑ/AE
тырӑ/A
уҫкӑч/A
уйлӑх/A
улача/A
упамас/A
уртмах/A
утиял/A
ушкӑнлӑх/A
фарингит/A
фетр/A
флагман/A
формуляр/A
фрахт/A
хӑвалӑх/A
хӑмач/A
хӑртлӑх/A
хӑях/A
хакас/A
хапӑлсӑр/A
хек/A
хризолит/A
хумхав/A
хурӑнлӑх/A
хут/A
хыпӑнчӑк/A
хытлӑх/A
цинизм/A
чӑмкӑҫ/A
чӑхӑ/A
чапсӑр/A
чех/A
чухӑн/AE
шӑмат/A
шӑрӑхлӑх/A
шав/A
шанӑҫлӑх/A
шарлатан/A
швеллер/A
шлемофон/A
шрифт/A
шукӑль/A
шушкӑ/A
ылмашу/A
эквивалент/A
экспроприатор/A
электрошнур/A
эрудит/A
югослав/A
юнтарчӑк/A
юста/A
ял/A
япалакка/A
яшлӑх/A
